output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX Gj Y 53
SFX Gj ěti l .
SFX Gj ěti la .
SFX Gj ěti lo .
SFX Gj ěti li .
SFX Gj ěti u .
SFX Gj ěti em .
SFX Gj ěti eš .
SFX Gj ěti e .
SFX Gj ěti emo .
SFX Gj ěti ete .
SFX Gj ěti ut .
SFX Gj ti h .
SFX Gj ti še .
SFX Gj ti hmo .
SFX Gj ti ste .
SFX Gj ti hu .
SFX Gj ěti i .
SFX Gj ěti imo .
SFX Gj ěti ite .
SFX Gj ěti uči .
SFX Gj ěti učego .
SFX Gj ěti učemu .
SFX Gj ěti učim .
SFX Gj ěti učem .
SFX Gj ěti učih .
SFX Gj ěti učimi .
SFX Gj ěti uča .
SFX Gj ěti uču .
SFX Gj ěti učej .
SFX Gj ěti učeju .
SFX Gj ěti uče .
SFX Gj ěti emy .
SFX Gj ěti emogo .
SFX Gj ěti emomu .
SFX Gj ěti emym .
SFX Gj ěti emom .
SFX Gj ěti emo .
SFX Gj ěti ema .
SFX Gj ěti emu .
SFX Gj ěti emoj .
SFX Gj ěti emoju .
SFX Gj ěti emi .
SFX Gj ěti eme .
SFX Gj ěti emyh .
SFX Gj ěti emym .
SFX Gj ěti emymi .
SFX Gj ěti ši .
SFX Gj ěti ša .
SFX Gj ěti še .
SFX Gj ěti ty .
SFX Gj ěti ta .
SFX Gj ěti to .
SFX Gj ěti tje .

SFX Gk Y 15
SFX Gk y o .
SFX Gk y a .
SFX Gk y ogo .
SFX Gk y u .
SFX Gk y oj .
SFX Gk y om .
SFX Gk y omu .
SFX Gk 0 m .
SFX Gk y oju .
SFX Gk y i .
SFX Gk y e .
SFX Gk 0 h .
SFX Gk 0 mi .
SFX Gk y ějši .
SFX Gk y ěje .

SFX Gl Y 9
SFX Gl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gl o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Gl o a/xPxE .
SFX Gl no en/xPxE .
SFX Gl o u/xPxE .
SFX Gl o ah/xPxE .
SFX Gl o am/xPxE .
SFX Gl 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Gl o ami/xPxE .

SFX Gm Y 2
SFX Gm 0 i .
SFX Gm 0 ju .

SFX Gn Y 11
SFX Gn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gn a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Gn a y/xPxE .
SFX Gn a u/xPxE .
SFX Gn ka ek/xPxE .
SFX Gn a ě/xPxE .
SFX Gn 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Gn 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Gn a oju/xPxE .
SFX Gn 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Gn a o/xPxE .

SFX Go Y 11
SFX Go 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Go 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Go ec ci/xPxE .
SFX Go ec ca/xPxE .
SFX Go ec cev/xPxE .
SFX Go ec cu/xPxE .
SFX Go ec cah/xPxE .
SFX Go ec cam/xPxE .
SFX Go ec cem/xPxE .
SFX Go ec cami/xPxE .
SFX Go ec če/xPxE .

SFX Gp Y 68
SFX Gp ti l .
SFX Gp ti la .
SFX Gp ti lo .
SFX Gp ti li .
SFX Gp stiti šču .
SFX Gp ti m .
SFX Gp ti š .
SFX Gp ti 0 .
SFX Gp ti mo .
SFX Gp i e .
SFX Gp iti et .
SFX Gp ti h .
SFX Gp ti še .
SFX Gp ti hmo .
SFX Gp ti ste .
SFX Gp ti hu .
SFX Gp iti eči .
SFX Gp iti eča .
SFX Gp iti eče .
SFX Gp ti my .
SFX Gp ti mogo .
SFX Gp ti momu .
SFX Gp ti mym .
SFX Gp ti mom .
SFX Gp ti mo .
SFX Gp ti ma .
SFX Gp ti mu .
SFX Gp ti moj .
SFX Gp ti moju .
SFX Gp ti mi .
SFX Gp ti me .
SFX Gp ti myh .
SFX Gp ti mym .
SFX Gp ti mymi .
SFX Gp ti vši .
SFX Gp ti všego .
SFX Gp ti všemu .
SFX Gp ti všim .
SFX Gp ti všem .
SFX Gp ti vših .
SFX Gp ti všimi .
SFX Gp ti vša .
SFX Gp ti všu .
SFX Gp ti všej .
SFX Gp ti všeju .
SFX Gp ti vše .
SFX Gp stiti ščeny .
SFX Gp stiti ščenogo .
SFX Gp stiti ščenomu .
SFX Gp stiti ščenym .
SFX Gp stiti ščenom .
SFX Gp stiti ščeni .
SFX Gp stiti ščene .
SFX Gp stiti ščenyh .
SFX Gp stiti ščenymi .
SFX Gp stiti ščena .
SFX Gp stiti ščenu .
SFX Gp stiti ščenoj .
SFX Gp stiti ščenoju .
SFX Gp stiti ščeno .
SFX Gp stiti ščenje/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenja/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenju/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenjem/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenij/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenjam/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenjami/xPxE .
SFX Gp stiti ščenjah/xPxE .

SFX Gq Y 7
SFX Gq 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gq a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Gq a u/xPxE .
SFX Gq a y/xPxE .
SFX Gq a ě/xPxE .
SFX Gq a oju/xPxE .
SFX Gq a o/xPxE .

SFX Gr Y 4
SFX Gr ogo to .
SFX Gr go m .
SFX Gr go mu .
SFX Gr ogo ym .

SFX Gs Y 6
SFX Gs 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gs 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Gs 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Gs 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Gs 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Gs k če/xPxE .

SFX Gt Y 5
SFX Gt 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gt e e/xPxBxO .
SFX Gt e a/xPxE .
SFX Gt e u/xPxE .
SFX Gt 0 m/xPxE .

SFX Gu Y 8
SFX Gu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Gu 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ju/xPxE .
SFX Gu 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX Gv Y 8
SFX Gv 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gv o a/xPxE .
SFX Gv o 0 .
SFX Gv o u/xPxE .
SFX Gv o ah/xPxE .
SFX Gv o am/xPxE .
SFX Gv 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Gv o ami/xPxE .

SFX Gw Y 68
SFX Gw ti l .
SFX Gw ti la .
SFX Gw ti lo .
SFX Gw ti li .
SFX Gw siti šu .
SFX Gw ti m .
SFX Gw ti š .
SFX Gw ti 0 .
SFX Gw ti mo .
SFX Gw i e .
SFX Gw iti et .
SFX Gw ti h .
SFX Gw ti še .
SFX Gw ti hmo .
SFX Gw ti ste .
SFX Gw ti hu .
SFX Gw iti eči .
SFX Gw iti eča .
SFX Gw iti eče .
SFX Gw ti my .
SFX Gw ti mogo .
SFX Gw ti momu .
SFX Gw ti mym .
SFX Gw ti mom .
SFX Gw ti mo .
SFX Gw ti ma .
SFX Gw ti mu .
SFX Gw ti moj .
SFX Gw ti moju .
SFX Gw ti mi .
SFX Gw ti me .
SFX Gw ti myh .
SFX Gw ti mym .
SFX Gw ti mymi .
SFX Gw ti vši .
SFX Gw ti všego .
SFX Gw ti všemu .
SFX Gw ti všim .
SFX Gw ti všem .
SFX Gw ti vših .
SFX Gw ti všimi .
SFX Gw ti vša .
SFX Gw ti všu .
SFX Gw ti všej .
SFX Gw ti všeju .
SFX Gw ti vše .
SFX Gw siti šeny .
SFX Gw siti šenogo .
SFX Gw siti šenomu .
SFX Gw siti šenym .
SFX Gw siti šenom .
SFX Gw siti šeni .
SFX Gw siti šene .
SFX Gw siti šenyh .
SFX Gw siti šenymi .
SFX Gw siti šena .
SFX Gw siti šenu .
SFX Gw siti šenoj .
SFX Gw siti šenoju .
SFX Gw siti šeno .
SFX Gw siti šenje/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenja/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenju/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenjem/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenij/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenjam/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenjami/xPxE .
SFX Gw siti šenjah/xPxE .

SFX Gx Y 81
SFX Gx ojdti šel .
SFX Gx ojdti šla .
SFX Gx ojdti šlo .
SFX Gx ojdti šli .
SFX Gx ti u .
SFX Gx ti em .
SFX Gx ti eš .
SFX Gx ti e .
SFX Gx ti emo .
SFX Gx ti ete .
SFX Gx ti ut .
SFX Gx ti eh .
SFX Gx ti eše .
SFX Gx ti ehmo .
SFX Gx ti este .
SFX Gx ti ehu .
SFX Gx ti i .
SFX Gx ti imo .
SFX Gx ti ite .
SFX Gx ti uči .
SFX Gx ti učego .
SFX Gx ti učemu .
SFX Gx ti učim .
SFX Gx ti učem .
SFX Gx ti učih .
SFX Gx ti učimi .
SFX Gx ti uča .
SFX Gx ti uču .
SFX Gx ti učej .
SFX Gx ti učeju .
SFX Gx ti uče .
SFX Gx ti omy .
SFX Gx ti omogo .
SFX Gx ti omomu .
SFX Gx ti omym .
SFX Gx ti omom .
SFX Gx ti omo .
SFX Gx ti oma .
SFX Gx ti omu .
SFX Gx ti omoj .
SFX Gx ti omoju .
SFX Gx ti omi .
SFX Gx ti ome .
SFX Gx ti omyh .
SFX Gx ti omym .
SFX Gx ti omymi .
SFX Gx ti omo .
SFX Gx ojdti ševši .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšego .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšemu .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšim .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšem .
SFX Gx ojdti ševših .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšimi .
SFX Gx ojdti ševša .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšu .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšej .
SFX Gx ojdti ševšeju .
SFX Gx ojdti ševše .
SFX Gx ti eny .
SFX Gx ti enogo .
SFX Gx ti enomu .
SFX Gx ti enym .
SFX Gx ti enom .
SFX Gx ti eni .
SFX Gx ti ene .
SFX Gx ti enyh .
SFX Gx ti enymi .
SFX Gx ti ena .
SFX Gx ti enu .
SFX Gx ti enoj .
SFX Gx ti enoju .
SFX Gx ti eno .
SFX Gx ti enje/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enja/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enju/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enjem/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enij/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enjam/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enjami/xPxE .
SFX Gx ti enjah/xPxE .

SFX Gy Y 9
SFX Gy 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Gy o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Gy o a/xPxE .
SFX Gy o 0 .
SFX Gy o u/xPxE .
SFX Gy o ah/xPxE .
SFX Gy o am/xPxE .
SFX Gy 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Gy o ami/xPxE .

SFX Gz Y 12
SFX Gz -nebud e-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud a-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud ego-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud u-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud ej-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud em-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud emu-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud im-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud eju-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud i-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud ih-nebud .
SFX Gz -nebud imi-nebud .

SFX HA Y 11
SFX HA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX HA 0 i/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 a/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 u/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 am/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 em/xPxE .
SFX HA 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX HA c če/xPxE .

SFX HB Y 8
SFX HB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX HB 0 i/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 am/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ju/xPxE .
SFX HB 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX HC Y 28
SFX HC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX HC y o/xBxPxE .
SFX HC y a/xPxE .
SFX HC y ogo/xPxE .
SFX HC y u/xPxE .
SFX HC y oj/xPxE .
SFX HC y om/xPxE .
SFX HC y omu/xPxE .
SFX HC 0 m/xPxE .
SFX HC y oju/xPxE .
SFX HC y i/xPxE .
SFX HC y e/xPxE .
SFX HC 0 h/xPxE .
SFX HC 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX HC oky ši/zz .
SFX HC oky šego/zz .
SFX HC oky šemu/zz .
SFX HC oky šim/zz .
SFX HC oky šem/zz .
SFX HC oky še/zz .
SFX HC oky ša/zz .
SFX HC oky šu/zz .
SFX HC oky šej/zz .
SFX HC oky šeju/zz .
SFX HC oky ših/zz .
SFX HC oky šim/zz .
SFX HC oky šimi/zz .
SFX HC oky je/zz .
