output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
žrěti/Gj
vsakodnevny/Gk
platno/Gl
osmnadset/Gm
kogo/Gr
barok/Gs
radio/Gv
běženec/Go
odojdti/Gx
čij-nebud/Gz
bliznec/HA
široky/HC
borba/Gq
angola/Gq
šolk/Gs
osm/Gm
govno/Gl
luč/HB
bagno/Gy
jesenj/HB
dvadeset/Gm
posrědny/Gk
jedinnadset/Gm
kraljevstvo/Gy
člověk/Gs
devetnadset/Gm
pet/Gm
paljto/Gy
trinadset/Gm
nositi/Gw
sedmnadset/Gm
četyrinadset/Gm
čudžinec/Go
odmstiti/Gp
sedm/Gm
solj/HB
tabak/Gs
deset/Gm
srědny/Gk
evropa/Gq
oblast/Gu
šestnadset/Gm
věč/HB
veto/Gy
gostiti/Gp
izglasiti/Gw
srědnjevěčje/Gt
šest/Gm
gumno/Gl
gluboky/HC
trideset/Gm
bezposrědny/Gk
basnj/HB
prositi/Gw
razpustiti/Gp
otec/Go
sedmdeset/Gm
plěsnj/HB
jedro/Gy
snižka/Gn
oprostiti/Gp
petdeset/Gm
devetdeset/Gm
sprositi/Gw
prodaž/HB
kanada/Gq
poslědny/Gk
petnadset/Gm
bedro/Gy
fizika/Gq
irak/Gs
dvanadset/Gm
devet/Gm
kvasiti/Gw
geto/Gy
mast/Gu
spustiti/Gp
krestiti/Gp
myslj/HB
mozambik/Gs
němec/Go
poljska/Gq
četyrideset/Gm
osmdeset/Gm
metro/Gy
zdravoohranjenje/Gt
ukrajina/Gq
šestdeset/Gm
vugrec/HA
aeronavtika/Gq
vodorast/Gu
kontrolj/HB
vstupjenje/Gt
izkusiti/Gw
prědny/Gk
poručiteljstvo/Gy
izvěstiti/Gp
donositi/Gw
uměstiti/Gp
ukryvanje/Gt
velžnost/Gu
prodavec/Go
pritisk/Gs
prědposlědny/Gk
čistiti/Gp
talirka/Gn
odnositi/Gw
steblo/Gy
litvanec/Go
slezk/Gs
afrika/Gq
bojaznj/HB
antarktida/Gq
vdečnost/Gu
suprovodženje/Gt
zadny/Gk
izpustiti/Gp
polnoč/HB
izojdti/Gx
obojdti/Gx
prěnositi/Gw
vnositi/Gw
raznositi/Gw
mstiti/Gp
koj-nebud/Gz
neposrědny/Gk
barvivo/Gy
prošlogodišny/Gk
pokrovnost/Gu
križ/HB
arktika/Gq
prěměstiti/Gp
babuška/Gn
člověkoljubje/Gt
črvenec/Go
hytrec/HA
hodženje/Gt
iznahodlivost/Gu
jednonočka/Gn
jutrišny/Gk
utrišny/Gk
jutro/Gy
krajnec/HA
nemožnost/Gu
prěnebrěženje/Gt
obručka/Gn
odprěti/Gj
opustiti/Gp
oružjenosec/Go
osmysljenost/Gu
povstanec/Go
različnost/Gu
sěveroiztok/Gs
slovenec/Go
sporazuměvanje/Gt
tečnost/Gu
uvažanje/Gt
vsakogodišny/Gk
izsměška/Gn
znalost/Gu
bolěznj/HB
godišny/Gk
odzavisiti/Gw
aplodovanje/Gt
lěnivec/Go
podlec/HA
slovačka/Gn
iztok/Gs
originalnost/Gu
kuba/Gq
televiděnje/Gt
krasavec/Go
kěšenj/HB
venezuela/Gq
puška/Gn
obezčestiti/Gp
prvenstvo/Gy
časovanje/Gt
čelik/Gs
dnešny/Gk
hipersvez/Gu
hranjenec/Go
hudožstvo/Gy
izgnanje/Gt
izkositi/Gw
katočka/Gn
konservativec/Go
krzno/Gl
kupoprodaž/HB
ukusiti/Gw
neustuplivy/Gk
plastik/Gs
pokrestiti/Gp
pracodavec/Go
proglasiti/Gw
pustiti/Gp
roptanje/Gt
ščedrost/Gu
sekretarka/Gn
stežka/Gn
supružstvo/Gy
těnj/HB
věrodostojnost/Gu
vnimanje/Gt
dolgočasiti/Gw
jedinačka/Gn
jezykotvorec/Go
nyněšny/Gk
stvarnost/Gu
soglasny/Gk
zrěnje/Gt
jazvec/HA
měrilo/Gy
poměstiti/Gp
tunec/Go
voznositi/Gw
oprěti/Gj
past/Gu
prěti/Gj
prežka/Gn
pripustiti/Gp
rodopisec/Go
sprěti/Gj
zapropastiti/Gp
aritmetika/Gq
korabokrušenec/Go
sebeljubje/Gt
seženj/HB
inostranec/Go
prostrěti/Gj
razprostrěti/Gj
dvojtočka/Gn
obvěstiti/Gp
veličstvo/Gy
vnutrišny/Gk
gvatemala/Gq
gajana/Gq
panama/Gq
cink/Gs
platina/Gq
prěvysiti/Gw
zlost/Gu
izprositi/Gw
mesožerec/Go
fazovanje/Gt
graběž/HB
fortepiano/Gy
čajka/Gn
varšava/Gq
minsk/Gs
etika/Gq
mudrec/HA
protivrěčnost/Gu
pokusiti/Gw
pročistiti/Gp
abrakadabra/Gq
amonijak/Gs
avtomatika/Gq
baroko/Gy
běsiti/Gw
bojec/Go
brvno/Gl
čaška/Gn
daljny/Gk
divina/Gq
dlato/Gy
gasiti/Gw
gnitje/Gt
golěnj/HB
hrabrec/HA
srazumělost/Gu
jedinec/Go
jednooky/HC
kaznj/HB
kokoška/Gn
kosooky/HC
krasiti/Gw
kresalo/Gy
krivoboky/HC
kudělj/HB
lajanje/Gt
ljstiti/Gp
lětny/Gk
lžec/HA
mědny/Gk
mladež/HB
modrooky/HC
mračnost/Gu
mrtvec/HA
mudo/Gy
muška/Gn
namastiti/Gp
naprěti/Gj
naručje/Gt
navěsiti/Gw
očistiti/Gp
odprositi/Gw
ohladženje/Gt
ravnost/Gu
razčistiti/Gp
razkoš/HB
sněguročka/Gn
strělec/Go
vapno/Gl
volapuk/Gs
vonj/HB
zelenj/HB
zodiak/Gs
karo/Gy
flegma/Gq
vozkresiti/Gw
stonožka/Gn
žovialnost/Gu
neodčudžajemy/Gk
blekdžek/Gs
bezvěrje/Gt
ljuljka/Gn
podojdti/Gx
subtilnost/Gu
onogdašny/Gk
studio/Gv
tornado/Gy
estetika/Gq
koristiti/Gp
včerašny/Gk
avstrijec/Go
kompatibilnost/Gu
tkanj/HB
podtalirka/Gn
petno/Gl
žrec/HA
evropejka/Gn
sdešny/Gk
fehtovanje/Gt
bradobrivec/Go
mango/Gy
obložka/Gn
aerodinamika/Gq
jugoiztok/Gs
poddržka/Gn
duplo/Gy
češka/Gn
kosmetika/Gq
naslědovanje/Gt
